

EIG Management Company, LLC: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 10:40 AM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of EIG Management Company, LLC



Snapshot People




Company Overview
EIG Management Company, LLC is a privately owned investment manager. It primarily provides its services to private pooled investment vehicles. The firm manages separate client-focused portfolios. It also launches and manages investment funds for its clients. The firm invests in the public equity and fixed income markets across the globe. It employs combination of fundamental and quantitative analysis to create its portfolio. The firm conducts in-house research to make its investments. It typically invests in energy sector. The firm was formerly known as Energy and Infrastructure Group of Trust Company of the West. EIG Management Company, LLC was founded in November, 2010 and is based in Wash...
EIG Management Company, LLC is a privately owned investment manager. It primarily provides its services to private pooled investment vehicles. The firm manages separate client-focused portfolios. It also launches and manages investment funds for its clients. The firm invests in the public equity and fixed income markets across the globe. It employs combination of fundamental and quantitative analysis to create its portfolio. The firm conducts in-house research to make its investments. It typically invests in energy sector. The firm was formerly known as Energy and Infrastructure Group of Trust Company of the West. EIG Management Company, LLC was founded in November, 2010 and is based in Washington, District of Columbia.
Detailed Description


1700 Pennsylvania Avenue NWSuite 800Washington, DC 20006-4700United StatesFounded in 2010



Phone: 202-600-3300

Fax: 202-600-3421








Key Executives for EIG Management Company, LLC




Mr. Robert Blair Thomas J.D.


      	Chief Executive Officer
      


Age: 54
        







Mr. Kurt Adolph Talbot


      	Co-President and Chief Investment Officer
      


Age: 55
        







Mr. Randall S. Wade


      	 Co-President and Chief Operating Officer
      








Mr. Pritpal Aujla CPA


      	Chief Financial Officer
      








Mr. Robert  L. Vitale J.D.


      	General Counsel
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact EIG Management Company, LLC, please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























	AMG Announces Investment in EIG Global Energy Partners






















AMG - Affiliated Managers Group, Inc.



Go




Home
News
USA

Websites:AsiaAustraliaCanadaEuropeMiddle EastUSA





About AMGAMG OverviewPhilosophyHistoryClientsProductsAMG FundsAMG Wealth PartnersAffiliatesManagement TeamProductsProducts OverviewClient TypesNew InvestmentsPartnership ApproachWhy Partnership WorksInvestment StructureInvestor RelationsInvestor OverviewPublic Filings & Other Financial InformationPress ReleasesAnnual ReportAnalyst CoverageShareholder InformationStock InformationCorporate GovernanceManagement TeamBoard of DirectorsInvestor PresentationContact Us





Investor Relations 

Back to All Press Releases

Affiliated Managers Group Inc. (ticker: AMG, exchange: New York Stock Exchange)News Release - 28-March-2014


Investor Relations:    
Media Relations:    
EIG Global Energy Partners, LLC:


Alexandra Lynn
Laura O'Brien
Laurie Labuda


(617)747-3300
(617)747-3300
(202)659-7903


ir@amg.com
pr@amg.com
llabuda@apcoworldwide.com



AMG Announces Investment in EIG Global Energy Partners; William C. Sonneborn Appointed President of EIGBOSTON AND WASHINGTON, D.C., March 28, 2014 – Affiliated Managers Group, Inc. (NYSE: AMG), a global asset management company, and EIG Global Energy Partners, LLC (“EIG”) announced today that AMG is acquiring an equity interest in EIG.  EIG’s management team continues to hold a majority of the equity in the company, and consistent with AMG’s partnership approach, will retain operating autonomy of the business.EIG also announced today that William C. Sonneborn has been appointed President of EIG effective May 5, 2014.EIG is a leading global alternative investment firm specializing in private investments in energy and energy-related infrastructure, with the longest continuous track record of any institutional investor in the industry.  Since its founding in 1982, EIG has made nearly 300 portfolio investments in 34 countries on six continents, across the full spectrum of the energy sector. Headquartered in Washington, D.C., with offices in Houston, Hong Kong, London, Rio de Janeiro, Sydney and Seoul, EIG employs a disciplined long-term approach built on a deep technical understanding of the sector, and is recognized as an industry leader in providing innovative capital solutions to leading companies and projects in the energy sector.  As of December 31, 2013, the firm had $15.9 billion in assets under management.EIG has consistently delivered strong risk-adjusted returns through multiple commodity and business cycles, and invests on a global basis across the entire energy value chain, including upstream, midstream, energy-related infrastructure, power generation, renewables and resources. The firm’s diversified client base includes over 400 leading institutional investors from 20 countries, including prominent pension plans, insurance companies, endowments, foundations and sovereign wealth funds.“With an outstanding long-term investment track record, and unmatched expertise in investing in energy and commodity markets, EIG is regarded as among the preeminent investors in the sector by sophisticated institutions and industry participants around the world,” said Sean M. Healey, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of AMG. “Given EIG’s exceptional reputation and competitive position, we believe the firm is uniquely placed to capitalize on the increasing investment opportunities in the energy sector and generate strong organic growth, as global clients continue to seek attractive risk-adjusted ways to deploy capital in this area.  Through our partnership with EIG, AMG is adding a new range of excellent strategies to our growing and diverse alternative product set.  I am very pleased to welcome Blair Thomas and his partners to our Affiliate group.”“With its unparalleled track record as a partner to leading boutique alternative firms, including a broad range of strategic capabilities through which AMG leverages its global scale on behalf of its Affiliates, AMG is the ideal permanent partner for EIG as we move into our next phase of growth and development,” said R. Blair Thomas, Chief Executive Officer of EIG.  “At EIG, we have employed a very focused and disciplined investment approach for more than 30 years, and our partnership with AMG will allow us to maintain both our operating culture and investment decision-making autonomy to best serve our global client base.  We are also extremely pleased to have Bill Sonneborn join our firm as President.  Bill is uniquely qualified to help guide EIG through the next stage of our growth based on his prior industry experience and his familiarity with EIG from our time together at TCW.”As part of the transaction, all of the senior professionals at EIG have agreed to long-term commitments to remain with the firm. The terms of the transaction were not disclosed, and the parties expect to complete the investment during the month of April.About Affiliated Managers GroupAMG is a global asset management company with equity investments in leading boutique investment management firms. AMG’s innovative partnership approach allows each Affiliate’s management team to own significant equity in their firm while maintaining operational autonomy. AMG’s strategy is to generate growth through the internal growth of existing Affiliates, as well as through investments in new Affiliates. In addition, AMG provides centralized assistance to its Affiliates in strategic matters, marketing, distribution, product development and operations. As of December 31, 2013, the aggregate assets under management of AMG’s Affiliates were approximately $568 billion (pro forma for pending investments) in more than 400 investment products across a broad range of investment styles, asset classes and distribution channels. For more information, please visit the Company’s website at www.amg.com. About EIG Global Energy PartnersEIG specializes in private investments in energy and energy-related infrastructure on a global basis.  EIG is headquartered in Washington, D.C. with offices in Houston, London, Sydney, Rio de Janeiro, Hong Kong and Seoul.  In 2010, EIG completed a consensual spin-out from The TCW Group, Inc.  For more information, visit www.eigpartners.com. William C. SonnebornMr. Sonneborn, 44, currently serves as Senior Advisor to KKR & Co.  Until October 2013, he was a member of the ultimate general partner of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. and a member of KKR’s Management Committee.  Mr. Sonneborn served as CEO of KKR Asset Management (the public markets side of KKR) as well as CEO and Director of KKR Financial LLC (NYSE: KFN), a publicly-traded specialty finance and energy business.  He was a member of the Credit, Mezzanine, Real Estate and Special Situations Investment Committees.  Prior to joining KKR, Mr. Sonneborn was with The TCW Group, Inc., most recently as President and Chief Operating Officer and CEO of The TCW Funds, Inc.Certain matters discussed in this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the federal securities laws. Actual results and the timing of certain events could differ materially from those projected in or contemplated by the forward-looking statements due to a number of factors, including changes in the securities or financial markets or in general economic conditions, the availability of equity and debt financing, competition for acquisitions of interests in investment management firms, the ability to close pending investments, the investment performance of our Affiliates and their ability to effectively market their investment strategies, and other risks detailed from time to time in AMG’s filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Reference is hereby made to the “Risk Factors” set forth in the Company’s Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013.AMG routinely posts information that may be significant for investors in the Investor Relations section of its website, and encourages investors to consult that section regularly. For additional information, please visit www.amg.com.




Site MapContact UsLegal Information



	© 2017 Affiliated Managers Group, Inc. All Rights Reserved.



















EIG Partners




































Investor Login













 











About Us




Our Investments




Latest News


















About Us | EIG, LLC

























































EIG is a boutique investment and merchant bank that was formed to assist investors and companies operating in media and entertainment


 
About Us
EIG has expertise in a number of media and entertainment industry sectors, including content distribution, filmed content, location-based entertainment, music rights, and musical theater.
Within these areas, the firm operates in four areas: investment banking, merchant banking, corporate advisory, and asset management.
Through all of its businesses, we seek to align the interests of our financial and strategic partners so that both can achieve their objectives. We invite interested parties to read further and contact us directly about our approach and how we might be able to assist you or your clients.
Securities placed by EIG are offered through Brooks, Houghton Securities, Inc., a registered securities broker-dealer and member of FINRA.













Asset Management | EIG, LLC

























































Our relationships and standing in the media and entertainment industry enable EIG to source proprietary investment opportunities


 
Asset Management
Many fund and asset managers promise outsized returns based on expertise in exploiting market inefficiencies. While we agree with the principal, we believe that the real opportunity lies not in the general market, but rather in having the experience to identify and exploit specific niches.
We understand that institutional investors, including defined benefit and defined contribution plans, investment authorities, endowments and foundations, must balance the need for current returns with the appropriate risk profile to ensure capital protection and long-term asset appreciation to meet future obligations.
We therefore seek to generate the highest possible returns for investors at the appropriate level of risk. Superior investment returns in and of themselves are not our primary objective, but rather superior performance with less-than-proportionate risk. Our bespoke investment vehicles are designed to protect our investors’ capital and provide current and total returns that enable them to meet their on-going and long-term obligations.
Our relationships and standing in the media and entertainment industry enables us to source proprietary equity and debt investment opportunities with attractive risk-reward profiles. Because of our knowledge and experience we are able to conduct thorough due diligence on all the assets and companies in which we invest. Once invested, EIG remains active in the monitoring and management of the investment, enabling us to increase stakeholder value.
In the event a more hands-on management of the portfolio company is required, our partners have the experience, capabilities and strategic relationships to provide interim management services to protect our investment and our investors’ capital.
We believe strong communication creates trust and confidence, enabling success for our client companies, our portfolio companies, our investors and ourselves.
We pride ourselves on building close relationships with our stakeholders. We rely on the strength of our relationships to understand our stakeholders’ objectives and to help them achieve their objectives.























Contact Us | EIG Partners








































Investor Login













 





Contact
Us



 










                            Contact Us                          

Your name *
  


Your e-mail address *
  


Message *
  








OUR OFFICES


Washington, D.C.
EIG Global Energy Partners1700 Pennsylvania Ave NW, Suite 800Washington, DC 20006(202) 600-3300

Houston, TX
EIG Global Energy PartnersThree Allen Center 333 Clay Street Suite 3500, Houston, TX 77002(713) 615-7400


London, UK
EIG Global Energy (Europe) LimitedFirst Floor, 45 Mount StreetLondon W1K 2RZ, United Kingdom+44 207 399 0910


Sydney, AU
EIG Global Energy (Australia) Pty. Ltd.Suite 2001, Level 20, Gateway1 Macquarie PlaceSydney, NSW 2000 Australia+61 2 9338 2100


Hong Kong, China
EIG Global Energy (Asia) LimitedSuite 3814-1638/F Two International Finance Centre8 Finance Street, Central, Hong Kong+852 3713 4333

Rio de Janeiro, Brazil
EIG Global Energy (Brasil) Representações Ltda.Praia de Botafogo, 228 Cj. 1101 - BotafogoRio de Janeiro, RJ BrasilCEP: 22250-040+55 21 3550 7460


Seoul, Korea
EIG Global Energy Korea, Ltd.16/F Two IFC10 Gukjegeumyung-ro, Yeongdeungpo-guSeoul, Korea 150-945+82 2 6137 9595
 







 




Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version
























| EIG Partners




































Investor Login













 





our
investments



 













Portfolio Companies
	The portfolio companies shown represent substantially all of EIG's investments in energy portfolio companies made since 2010, realized and unrealized, as of March 31, 2017.  The specific portfolio companies identified are not representative of all of the portfolio companies purchased, sold, or recommended for the funds and it should not be assumed that the investment in the portfolio companies identified was or will be profitable. Actual holdings will vary for each fund and there is no guarantee that a particular fund will hold any or all of the portfolio companies listed.  A list of all investments is available upon request.
	

Name & Description


 
Sector
Date Funded
Status





 



Abengoa Abengoa (MCE: ABG.B/P SM /NASDAQ: ABGB) applies innovative technology solutions for sustainability in the energy and environment sectors, gathering electricity from renewable resources, converting biomass into biofuels and producing drinking water from sea water. 
Learn more...

Power & Renewables
03/19/2013
Active





 



Bioenergy Infrastructure Group Bioenergy Infrastructure Group ("BIG") is an independent power producer established to invest in the greenfield construction of biomass and waste to energy plants in the UK.

Learn more...

Power & Renewables
02/16/2017
Active





 



Breitburn Energy Partners, LP Breitburn Energy Partners LP is a publicly traded, independent oil and gas master limited partnership focused on the acquisition, development, and production of oil and gas properties throughout the United States.
Learn more...

Upstream
04/08/2015
Active





 



BTB Pipeline The Bolivia-Brazil natural gas pipeline (“BTB”) runs over 3,000 km and has a capacity of over 30 million cubic meters per day. 
Learn more...

Midstream
07/12/2012
Active





 



Cheniere Energy, Inc. Cheniere Energy, Inc. (NYSE MKT: LNG) (Cheniere), is a Houston-based energy company primarily engaged in LNG-related businesses. 
Learn more...

Midstream
05/13/2015
Active





 



CHK Cleveland Tonkawa, L.L.C. Chesapeake Energy Corporation (“Chesapeake”) (NYSE:CHK) is the second-largest producer of natural gas and the 10th largest producer of oil and natural gas liquids in the U.S.
Learn more...

Upstream
03/29/2012
Realized





 



CHK Utica, L.L.C Chesapeake Energy Corporation (“Chesapeake”) (NYSE:CHK) is the second-largest producer of natural gas and the 10th largest producer of oil and natural gas liquids in the 
Learn more...

Upstream
11/02/2011
Active





 



Coalspur Coalspur Mines Limited (TSX:CPT, ASX:CPL) ("Coalspur" or "Company") is a thermal coal development company with approximately 55,000 hectares of leases located within the Hinton region of Alberta, Canada. 
Learn more...

Resources
04/01/2013
Realized





 



Crown Oil Partners V, LP  Crown Oil Partners V, LP acquires and develops low-risk oil and natural gas exploitation properties located in the Permian Basin.
Learn more...

Upstream
09/09/2016
Active





 



El Dorado Resources, LLC El Dorado Resources, LLC is a partnership between Fleur de Lis Energy, LLC and EIG Global Energy Partners, LLC focused on the development of oil and gas properties in the Permian Basin of West Texas.
Learn more...

Upstream
06/13/2016
Active



 
Pages1
2
3
next ›
last »

 







 














| EIG Partners










































Investor Login













 





Our
People



 














Name


 
Title
Practice Area /Sector Focus
Location






 


Marcel Abe
Vice President
Investment Team, Latin America
Rio de Janeiro, Brazil



 

 


Pritpal Aujla
Senior Vice President & Chief Financial Officer
Finance & Accounting
Washington, DC



 

 


Mark Bilali
Vice President
Investment Team, Power & Renewables
Washington, DC



 

 


Brian Boland
Senior Vice President
Investment Team, Midstream, Power & Renewables
Washington, DC



 

 


Jean-Daniel Borgeaud
Managing Director & Head of Power and Renewables
Investment Team, Power & Renewables
London, UK



 

 


Jennifer Bounan
Vice President & Senior Tax Manager
Finance & Accounting
Washington, DC



 

 


Karaina Callahan
Executive Assistant
Administration
Washington, DC



 

 


Rick Caplan
Managing Director & Head of Capital Markets
Investment Team, Oil & Gas
Washington, DC



 

 


Meghan Carey
Vice President & Senior Compliance Officer
Legal & Compliance
Washington, DC



 

 


Claire Chen
Vice President & Senior Tax Manager
Finance & Accounting
London, UK



 

 
Pages1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
…
next ›
last »

 







 




EIG Management Co LLC: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback





























eig management co llc
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Asset Management
Sub-Industry: Investment Companies
EIG Management Company, LLC operates as an investment company. The Company invests in energy portfolio companies. EIG Management serves customers worldwide.




Corporate Information
Address:

1700 Pennsylvania Avenue
Northwest Suite 800
Washington, DC 20006
United States


Phone:
1-202-600-3300


Fax:
-


Web url:
www.eigpartners.com























From The Web











Key Executives


Robert Blair Thomas


Chief Executive Officer




Pritpal Singh Aujla


Chief Financial Officer




Randall Scott Wade


Chief Operating Officer




Carla Pilar Vogel


Chief Compliance Officer




Brian Boland


Senior Vice President




Robert Louis Vitale


General Counsel







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data


































 







EIG Global Energy Partners LLC v. TCW Asset Management Company et al































Search




Advanced Search

Take a Free Trial | 
					Sign In






















 Close


Law360 In-Depth
Law360 UK
Adv. Search & Platform Tools
Browse all sections 
Banking
Bankruptcy
Class Action
Competition
Employment
Energy
Expert Analysis
Insurance
Intellectual Property
Product Liability
Securities
Rankings
Law360's MVPs
Glass Ceiling Report
Global 20
Law360 400
Diversity Snapshot
Practice Group Partner Rankings
Practice Groups of the Year
Pro Bono Firms of the Year
Rising Stars
Trial Aces
Site Menu
Join the Law360 team
Search legal jobs
Learn more about Law360
Read testimonials
Contact Law360
Sign up for our newsletters
Site Map
Help










August 20, 2012
EIG Global Energy Partners LLC v. TCW Asset Management Company et al



Track this case


Case Number:
2:12-cv-07173
Court:
California Central
Nature of Suit:
Contract: Other
Judge:
Christina A. Snyder
Firms

Munger Tolles

Companies

EIG Global Energy Partners
TCW Group Inc.

Sectors & Industries:


Financial

Asset Management










View recent docket activity


Reflects complaints, answers, motions, orders and trial notes entered from Jan. 1, 2011.Additional or older documents may be available in Pacer.




Coverage


December  3, 2012
TCW To Move Forward With Sale To Carlyle Despite EIG Suit
A California federal judge issued an injunction Friday allowing TCW Group Inc.'s to sell its assets to the Carlyle Group LP as long as it meets certain conditions, after TCW's joint venture partner EIG Global Energy Partners LLC fought to block the deal.


							4 other articles on this case. View all »



Parties
To view the parties, register now.



Try Law360 FREE for seven days
Already a subscriber? Click here to login

















×
Already have access? Click here to login



Get instant access to the one-stop news source for business lawyers
Register Now!




Get instant access to the one-stop news source for business lawyers













Email (Professional email required)






First Name



Last Name







PLEASE NOTE: A verification email will be sent to your address before you can access your trial.


Password (at least 6 characters required)



Confirm Password







Select at least one primary interest:


 Aerospace & Defense
										

 Appellate
										

 Asset Management
										

 Automotive
										

 Banking
										

 Bankruptcy
										

 California
										

 Capital Markets
										

 Class Action
										

 Commercial Contracts
										

 Competition
										

 Consumer Protection
										

 Corporate
										

 Cybersecurity & Privacy
										

 Delaware
										

 Employment
										

 Energy
										

 Environmental
										

 Financial Services Uk
										

 Florida
										

 Food & Beverage
										

 Government Contracts
										

 Health
										

 Hospitality
										

 Illinois
										

 Immigration
										

 Insurance
										

 Insurance Uk
										

 Intellectual Property
										

 International Arbitration
										

 International Trade
										

 Law360 In Depth
										

 Legal Ethics
										

 Life Sciences
										

 Media & Entertainment
										

 Medical Malpractice
										

 Mergers & Acquisitions
										

 Native American
										

 New Jersey
										

 New York
										

 Pennsylvania
										

 Private Equity
										

 Product Liability
										

 Project Finance
										

 Public Policy
										

 Real Estate
										

 Retail & E Commerce
										

 Securities
										

 Sports
										

 Tax
										

 Technology
										

 Telecommunications
										

 Texas
										

 Transportation
										

 Trials
										

 White Collar
										





Register




Already have access?




Email:



Password:

Forgot your password?


Remember login



Sign In





































Businesses | EIG Partners




































Investor Login













 





Our
Businesses



 







                            Businesses                          






ENERGY FUNDS

EIG's energy funds focus on providing hybrid debt and structured equity financing solutions to energy projects and companies on a global basis. The funds target directly negotiated private transactions with mid- and large-cap energy companies and projects with an emphasis on transactions underpinned by hard assets, such as proven oil and gas reserves, pipelines, gathering systems, processing facilities, liquefied natural gas terminals, power plants, alternative energy and similar opportunities. The funds have the ability to invest in U.S. dollars, Euros, Pounds Sterling, Canadian dollars and Australian dollars.






HARBOUR ENERGY LTD

EIG and The Noble Group (“Noble”), have joined together to form a new company, Harbour Energy, Ltd. (“Harbour”), which focuses on making control and near control investments in upstream and midstream companies, primarily outside of the United States. Harbour operates at the confluence of three major trends in the global energy industry – new sources of supply, changing trade patterns and changes in the commodity trading industry causing traditional financial intermediaries to exit and independent physical energy trading houses to gain in importance. Harbour is entirely managed by EIG but benefits from Noble’s industry leading expertise in energy trading, logistics and risk management.






CREDIT/DIRECT LENDING

Since 2001, EIG's credit/direct lending vehicles have targeted higher credit quality project finance instruments. These vehicles provide senior and high yield loans to energy and infrastructure projects and companies on a global basis. EIG believes that an ability to make senior, longer duration investments provides a competitive advantage, given that many energy and infrastructure assets have long useful lives and often are supported by stable, contracted cash flows.



 









 











EIG Global Energy Partners LLC v. TCW Asset Management Company et al Docket Item 112 | United States Courts Archive











You're viewing Docket Item 112 from the case EIG Global Energy Partners LLC v. TCW Asset Management Company et al. View the full docket and case details.
Download this document: 




























View plain text
Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 1 of 22 Page ID

#:2863

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT "O"
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

Present: The Honorable

CHRISTINA A. SNYDER

CATHERINE JEANG

Deputy Clerk

Attorneys Present for Plaintiffs:

Mary Rickey

N/A

Court Reporter / Recorder

Tape No.
Attorneys Present for Defendants

Mark Helm, Kevin Allred, Gregory Sergi
Proceedings: 

Eric Waxman, Thomas Nolan, Carl Roth

PLAINTIFF’S MOTION FOR PRELIMINARY INJUNCTION
RE ENJOINING ACQUISITION PENDING ARBITRATION
(Docket # 6, filed August 21, 2012)

I.

INTRODUCTION

Plaintiff initiated this action on August 21, 2012. The complaint alleges three

claims for relief: (1) breach of contract, (2) anticipatory breach of contract, and (3)
tortious interference with contract. 

On August 21, 2012, plaintiff filed a motion for preliminary injunction. On

October 1, 2012, defendants filed an opposition, and on October 22, plaintiff filed a
reply. Plaintiff’s motion is presently before the Court. 

II.

BACKGROUND

Plaintiff EIG Global Energy Partners, LLC (“EIG”) seeks to enjoin the sale by
Societe Generale Holding de Participations, S.A. (“Societe Generale”) of its indirect
subsidiary, TCW Asset Management Company (“TAMCO”), to one of plaintiff’s
competitors, Carlyle Global Financial Services Partners, L.P (“Carlyle”). The
background facts underlying this case are not in dispute. Plaintiff EIG is an asset
manager that specializes in raising and investing funds in the area of energy and energy
infrastructure. Defendant The TCW Group, Inc. (“TCW”) manages investment products,
and defendant TAMCO is a subsidiary of TCW. 

CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 1 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 2 of 22 Page ID

#:2864

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

Prior to 2009, EIG’s principals and several of its employees operated as a

subgroup within TCW that focused on energy and infrastructure investments. In 2009,
EIG’s principals and TCW agreed to permit EIG’s principals to leave TCW and establish
a new business. This new business took the form of a cooperative venture under which
EIG would continue managing funds already operated by the EIG principals, raise new
funds, and distribute payments to TCW from the funds. 

The process through which EIG and TCW accomplished this goal was governed

by an “Omnibus Agreement.” See Vitale Decl. Ex. B. This agreement provided that the
separation between EIG and TCW would occur in three phases. As the phases
progressed, different amounts of the revenue generated by the funds were allocated
between TCW and EIG, and control over the funds would be gradually transferred to
EIG. Specifically, those funds launched during phase 1 were operated through TCW,
those launched during phase 2 were operated through a limited liability company
operated by EIG and TAMCO, and those launched during phase 3 were operated by
EIG. 1

On the same day the parties entered into the Omnibus Agreement, TAMCO and
EIG entered into an ancillary agreement governing the operation of the joint venture to
be formed between EIG and TAMCO after the above phases were commenced. See
Vitale Decl. Ex. A (“LLC Agreement”). The LLC Agreement was attached as an exhibit
to the Omnibus Agreement. Pursuant to the Omnibus Agreement, this joint venture took
the form of an LLC (named TCW - EIG Alternative Investments, LLC, referred to
hereafter as “the LLC”) jointly owned by TAMCO and EIG. The LLC proceeded to act
as a general partner for Energy Fund XV, a fund focused on energy investments. 

1

Pursuant to the Omnibus Agreement, Phase 1 began on October 16, 2009 and

ended when the parties executed their first “New Product Launch,” which appears to be
Energy Fund XV. Omnibus Agreement, Recital 3. The precise date this launch occurred
is unclear from the parties submissions. Phase 2 began immediately when Phase 1
ended, and though the parties initially planned in the Omnibus Agreement to end Phase 2
on December 31, 2011, the parties later agreed to end Phase 2 on December 31, 2010. 
See Omnibus Agreement Recital 4; Stern Decl. ¶ 33. Phase 3 then commenced on
January 1, 2011, and is set to end January 1, 2020. Omnibus Agreement, Recital 5. 
CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 2 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 3 of 22 Page ID

#:2865

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

In August 2012, Societe Generale announced its plans to sell its controlling

interest in TCW to investment funds controlled by Carlyle (“the Carlyle transaction”). 
Carlyle, like EIG, manages funds that focus on private energy investments. Seeking to
prevent this sale, EIG initiated arbitration on August 13, 2012 through the Los Angeles
office of Judicial Arbitration & Mediations Services, pursuant to the Omnibus
Agreement and LLC Agreement (see Section IV.A below). As of August 21, 2012, an
arbitrator had not been selected, and EIG filed the motion for a preliminary injunction
now before the Court. 

III. LEGAL STANDARD

A preliminary injunction is an “extraordinary remedy.” Winter v. Natural Res. Def.
Council, Inc., 555 U.S. 7, 24 (2008). “A plaintiff seeking a preliminary injunction must
establish that he is likely to succeed on the merits, that he is likely to suffer irreparable
harm in the absence of preliminary relief, that the balance of equities tips in his favor,
and that an injunction is in the public interest.” Am. Trucking Ass’n, Inc. v. City of Los
Angeles, 559 F.3d 1046, 1052 (9th Cir. 2009); see also Cal Pharms. Ass’n v. Maxwell-
Jolly, 563 F.3d 847, 849 (9th Cir. 2009). Alternatively, “‘serious questions going to the
merits’ and a hardship balance that tips sharply toward the plaintiff can support issuance
of an injunction, assuming the other two elements of the Winter test are also met.”
Alliance for the Wild Rockies v. Cottrell, 632 F.3d 1127, 1132 (9th Cir. 2011). A
“serious question” is one on which the movant “has a fair chance of success on the
merits.” Sierra On-Line, Inc. v. Phoenix Software, Inc., 739 F.2d 1415, 1421 (9th Cir.
1984). Under either formulation, demonstrating a likelihood of success on the merits and
irreparable harm is “most critical.” Nken v. Holder, 556 U.S. 418, 434 (2009).

IV. ANALYSIS

A.

Injunctions Preserving the Status Quo Pending Arbitration are
Permissible

District courts have the authority to grant a preliminary injunction to preserve the

status quo pending arbitration. Toyo Tire Holdings of Amercias Inc. v. Continental Tire
North America, Inc., 609 F.3d 975, 980 (9th Cir. 2010). As the Ninth Circuit has

CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 3 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 4 of 22 Page ID

#:2866

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

recognized, such injunctions can be necessary to insure “the meaningfulness of the
arbitration process,” and therefore further the congress’s policy in favor of enforcing
arbitration agreements. Id. Other circuits are in agreement. See id. at 981 – 982
(collecting cases). Additionally, the Ninth Circuit in Toyo Tire explained that
preliminary relief in this context is particularly important because “one party to the
arbitration often has an incentive to delay arbitration proceedings to its own advantage,”
and “[e]ven without bad faith by either party, the selection of arbitrators and the
constitution of the arbitral panel necessarily takes time.” Id. at 981. 

Here, the arbitration agreements specifically provides that the parties may seek a

preliminary injunction under these circumstances. Specifically, the LLC agreement and
Omnibus Agreement both provide that the parties may seek “provisional injunctive relief
. . . in a court of law while arbitration proceedings are pending, and any provisional
injunctive relief granted by such court shall remain effective until the matter is finally
determined by the Arbitrator.” LLC Agreement § 10.5; Omnibus Agreement § 9.10. 
Therefore, this Court has authority to issue an injunction that remains in effect until final
resolution of this matter in arbitration, provided that plaintiff establishes that there are
grounds for granting injunctive relief. Toyo Tire, 609 F.3d at 981. The Court next turns
to those grounds. 

B. Whether Plaintiff is Likely to Succeed on the Merits

This case is essentially a contract dispute that hinges on the construction of two

agreements: the Omnibus Agreement and the LLC Agreement. According to plaintiff,
the sale of TCW is barred by § 5.1 of the LLC Agreement, which states in relevant part:
“no Membership Interest of portion thereof can be Transferred without the Consent of a
Supermajority of the Board of Directors.” LLC Agreement § 5.1. Plaintiff further points
out that the term “Transfer” is explicitly defined in the LLC agreement to mean “a sale,
exchange, transfer, assignment, including through the transfer of control by means of the
transfer of voting stock or other equity interest, of a Membership Interest.” LLC
Agreement Appendix 1 § 1.2. Plaintiff argues that the portion of this definition referring
to “voting stock or other equity interest” makes clear that § 5.1 prohibits transactions in
equity that would result in a change in control of TAMCO, which holds a Membership
Interest in the LLC. 

CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 4 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 5 of 22 Page ID

#:2867

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

Plaintiff contends that the accuracy of this reading of § 5.1 is confirmed by the sole
exception under which a party to the LLC agreement can transfer its interest without the
consent of a supermajority of the board. Pursuant to § 5.1, a Membership Interest can be
transferred without consent to a “Member’s wholly-owned subsidiary so long as . . . such
subsidiary remains wholly-owned by such Member.” Plaintiff infers that because the
only excepted transfer is one in which a Membership Interest remains in the hands of an
entity wholly controlled by a Member, a transaction that changes which entity exercises
ultimate control over the entity holding the Membership Interest is barred. 

Plaintiff concludes that because § 5.1 prohibits a transfer of control of TAMCO
without the consent of a supermajority of the LLC’s board of directors, the proposed
acquisition by Carlyle violates § 5.1. Plaintiff contends that a change of control will take
place for the simple reason that prior to the transaction Societe Generale ultimately
controlled TAMCO, but after the transaction Carlyle will ultimately control TAMCO. 
Moreover, plaintiff explains that the LLC’s board has not consented to the sale, and that
TAMCO could not obtain consent if it tried because EIG selects a majority of the board. 

Plaintiff further argues that its interpretation reasonably construes § 5.1 in a manner

consistent with the way that courts interpret prior-consent and first-refusal clauses in
agreements governing closely held business ventures. As plaintiff points out, the
Delaware Court of Chancery has explained: 

Antiassignment clauses are normally included in contracts to prevent the
introduction of a stranger into the contracting parties' relationship and to
assure performance by the original contracting parties. . . . In some business
relationships the continued personal involvement of an original contracting
party is a material premise of the contract itself. In such cases any
assignment is problematic. In other cases the parties fear that the assignee
will either not perform or will perform inadequately, in which case what is
problematic is not the assignment per se but the identity of the assignee.

Star Cellular Telephone Co., Inc. v. Baton Rouge CGSA, Inc., 19 Del. J. Corp. L. 875,
890 (Del. Ch. 1993). Though the Delaware Court of Chancery in Star Cellular ultimately

CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 5 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 6 of 22 Page ID

#:2868

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

found that a merger challenged by the plaintiffs in that case did not effect a transfer
because it did not change the identity of the company or managers who exercised
ultimate control over plaintiffs’ business partners, see id. at 892, in this case plaintiff
argues that the proposed sale would change ultimate control over TAMCO in violation
of the purpose of antiassignment clauses such as § 5.1. See also In re Asian Yard
Partners, 1995 WL 1781675 at 7 – 8 (interpreting an anti-transfer provision in
partnership agreement to “encompass[] a situation where there is a transfer of a
controlling interest in a partner entity, because such a transaction effectively transfers a
partner interest to the control of the party acquiring the controlling interest of the partner
entity.”); Oregon RSA No. 6, Inc. v. Castle Rock Cellular of Oregon Ltd. Partnership,
840 F.Supp. 770, 774 – 775 (D. Oregon 1993) (finding that an agreement that prevented
an entity from transferring its interest in a partnership also prevented the sale of that
entity, where the entity’s only significant asset was the partnership interest). 

Plaintiff recognizes that TAMCO is the only defendant that signed the LLC

2

Agreement, but argues that the other defendants can nonetheless be enjoined from taking
any steps to complete the proposed acquisition by Carlyle. Plaintiff offers two
arguments in support of this conclusion. First, plaintiff argues that TAMCO had actual
and apparent authority to bind TCW because all defendants signed the Omnibus
Agreement, which contained the complete text of the LLC Agreement and stated that it
would be executed. Omnibus Agreement § 3.1(a). Plaintiff concludes that TCW
therefore authorized TAMCO to impose upon it the obligations in the LLC Agreement. 
See also Omnibus Agreement § 9.2 (“the TCW Parties agree not to take and agree not to
permit any of their respective affiliates to take, any action intended to circumvent,
diminish or impair the economic, governance or other rights of the other parties and
under this Agreement.”). 

2

Plaintiff also notes that even if these other entities were not liable for breaches of
the LLC agreement, and hence were not subject to a preliminary injunction, an injunction
binding TAMCO would likely be sufficient to stop the proposed sale because
“consummation of the deal would presumably require various forms of action by
TAMCO, including obtaining consents, providing information, and the like.” Ptf.’s Mot.
at 12. 
CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 6 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 7 of 22 Page ID

#:2869

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

Second, plaintiff argues that TCW can be enjoined from violating § 5.1 of the LLC

Agreement on the theory that their actions directly caused TAMCO to breach § 5.1. 
Plaintiff explains that while corporate parents are not generally liable for the actions of
their subsidiaries, a corporate parent is liable when it uses its ownership of a subsidiary
to make the subsidiary commit an unlawful act. See Esmark, Inc. v. N.L.R.B., 887 F.2d
739, 757 (7th Cir. 1989) (following Kingston Dry Dock Co. v. Lake Champlain Transp.
Co., 31 F.2d 265, 267 (2d Cir. 1929) (L. Hand, J.). 

3

In response, defendants argue that § 5.1 of the LLC Agreement cannot prevent

Societe Generale from selling its stake in TCW because the Omnibus Agreement
contains no provision preventing the sale, and under § 10.14 of the LLC Agreement, any
inconsistency between the two agreements is resolved by looking to the Omnibus
Agreement. Moreover, defendants argue that § 4.6 of the Omnibus Agreement
demonstrates that the proposed sale of TCW to Carlyle can go forward without EIG’s
consent. Specifically, defendants point to the portion of § 4.6 that provides:

If . . . TCW Group or any of its controlled affiliates is a party to any
transaction whereby TCW Group or any of its controlled affiliates acquires,
merges with, is acquired by or becomes affiliated with any party active in
the energy or infrastructure business with products that compete (directly or
indirectly) with EIG’s products offered as of the date of this Agreement . . .
then [EIG] may, as its sole and exclusive remedy, accelerate the operational
and personnel transition to [EIG] that is scheduled to occur in the Phase 3
Period. 

Omnibus Agreement § 4.6. Defendants contend that the Omnibus Agreement
specifically contemplates the possibility that TCW will be acquired by an EIG
competitor, and specifies that in those circumstances, EIG’s “sole and exclusive remedy”
is to “accelerate the operational and personnel transition scheduled to occur in the Phase

3

Plaintiff also argues that even if TCW is not liable for a breach of the LLC

Agreement, it could still practically be prevented from consummating the sale because
the injunction would prevent them from conspiring with or aiding and abetting
TAMCO’s violation of the injunction. 
CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 7 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 8 of 22 Page ID

#:2870

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

3 Period.” Defendants conclude that because the Omnibus Agreement controls in the
event of any inconsistency between it and the LLC Agreement, this provision prevents
plaintiff from seeking an injunction barring the sale of TCW without approval of a
supermajority of the joint venture’s board. 

Additionally, defendants argue that even if the LLC Agreement were controlling,

that agreement does not prohibit the sale of TCW without the consent of a supermajority
of the board. According to defendants, § 5.1 of the LLC Agreement only applies to
transfers of a Membership Interest by a “Member” to a third party. Defendants therefore
conclude that because TAMCO will be the entity holding the Membership Interest before
and after the sale of TCW to Carlyle, no transfer will occur and the sale will not violate §
5.1.

Buttressing its interpretation of § 5.1, defendant points to case law that has found

that a change in corporate control of a partner in a joint venture does not thereby
introduce a new party to the business venture. In Northeast Communications of
Wisconsin, Inc. v. CenturyTel, Inc., 516 F.3d 608 (7th Cir. 2008), the Seventh Circuit
considered whether a partnership agreement giving the partners in a joint venture a right
of first refusal pertaining to transfers of partnership interests became activated when the
parent of one of the entities holding a partnership interest underwent a merger. Id. at 609
– 610. Plaintiff argued that the merger of defendant’s parent with another corporation
triggered the right of first refusal because it effectively introduced a stranger into the
business venture. Id. at 611. Rejecting this argument, the Seventh Circuit reasoned the
merger accomplished no such thing because “a new (indirect) owner may give Universal
new marching orders, but so may a new CEO of a partner that has no corporate parent,
and a change of CEO (or a new business plan adopted by an old CEO) does not give
other partners a buyout right.” Id.; see also Engel v. Teleprompter Corp., 703 F.2d 127,
134 – 135 (finding that no transfer of stock held by a subsidiary occurred through the
sale of the subsidiary’s corporate parent because direct ownership of the stock by the
subsidiary was not altered in the sale of the subsidiary’s parent). 

Defendants further argue that plaintiff’s construction of § 5.1 leads to several
absurd consequences. First, defendants claim that plaintiff’s position leads to the
conclusion that any transfer of the stock of any entity that possesses an interest in

CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 8 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 9 of 22 Page ID

#:2871

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

TAMCO requires EIG consent. Defendants claim that this result is a necessary
consequence of plaintiff’s interpretation because § 5.1 applies to the transfer of any
portion of a Membership Interest, and presumably the transfer of any portion of the
equity of a company that controls TAMCO would in turn amount to a transfer of a
portion of the Membership Interest held by TAMCO. Second, defendants argue that
under plaintiff’s construction of § 5.1, no third party could obtain a controlling interest
in Societe Generale without EIG’s consent. Defendants contend that it would be absurd
to read the LLC agreement to contain such a broad restraint on alienation binding
complete strangers to the LLC Agreement. Third, defendants argue that the bargaining
history and conduct of the parties shows that it would be absurd to find that a critical
term in their overall relationship is “buried” in an appendix to the LLC Agreement. 
Instead, defendants argue, if the parties intended to restrict Societe Generale’s ability to
sell its interest in TCW, it would have made more sense to include that restriction in an
agreement signed by Societe Generale. 

In reply, plaintiff argues that there is no inconsistency between the Omnibus

Agreement and the LLC Agreement insofar as the LLC Agreement merely contains an
additional restriction on transfers in control that is not present in the Omnibus
Agreement. Additionally, plaintiff argues that § 4.6 of the Omnibus Agreement and §
5.1 LLC Agreement do not conflict because they address different concerns. Plaintiff
explains that § 4.6 of the Omnibus Agreement addresses the consequences that follow
when TCW becomes a competitor of EIG, whereas § 5.1 focuses on any change in
control over TCW. Finally, plaintiff argues that exclusive remedy portion of § 4.6 of the
Omnibus Agreement does not limit plaintiff’s remedies in this case because it only
applies if the parties have not already reached Phase 3 of their relationship. Since the
parties agree that Phase 3 has already commenced, plaintiff concludes that this clause
does not limit its ability to seek this injunction. 

The Court finds plaintiff’s construction of the agreements more convincing, and
therefore finds that plaintiff is likely to succeed on the merits. The plain terms of the
LLC agreement require the consent of a supermajority of the board before control over a
Membership Interest is transferred “by means of the transfer of voting stock or other
equity interest.” LLC Agreement, Appendix 1 § 1.2. The parties agree that consent of a
supermajority of the LLC’s board has not been obtained, and because the Carlyle sale 

CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 9 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 10 of 22 Page ID

#:2872

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

would transfer control over TAMCO from Societe Generale to Carlyle, the Carlyle sale
is prohibited by the plain terms of the LLC Agreement. 4

Other courts have construed anti-transfer provisions similarly even when those

provisions do not explicitly define “transfer” to include changes in control affected by
transfers of voting stock or other equity. In Oregon RSA No. 6, for example, the
plaintiff sued to exercise a right of first refusal to purchase a partnership interest when
the defendants did not purchase the partnership interest itself, but instead purchased the
entities that held the partnership interest. Oregon RSA No. 6, 840 F. Supp. at 773. Since
the parties’ contract only explicitly applied to “tranfer[s]” of partnership interests, and
not transfers of the entities holding partnership interests, the district court was faced with
the question whether a partnership interest was effectively transferred through a sale of
the entities which held that partnership interest. Id. at 774. The Court found that a
transfer did occur under these circumstances, and that any other result would circumvent
the purpose of the right-of-first refusal clause. Id. at 775. 

In re Asian Yard Partners, 1995 WL 1781675 (D. Del. Br. Ct. 1995) is similarly
instructive. There, the debtor took the position that its sale of the stock of an entity
holding a partnership interest did not violate a provision barring any partnership interest
transfer “directly or indirectly, or by operation of law,” because that entity would still be
the direct holder of the partnership interest before and after the stock sale. Id. at 6. The
bankruptcy court disagreed, finding that “a transfer of control of a corporate general
partner is prohibited as an indirect transfer of a general partner interest.” Id. at 9. 

The Court’s interpretation of the LLC Agreement does not render it irretrievably

inconsistent with the Omnibus Agreement. As plaintiff points out, there is no

4

Since the Court relies on the definition of “Transfer” set out in the appendix of
the LLC Agreement, which specifically contemplates that transfers can occur through
transfer of voting stock or other equity, Engel and CenturyTel do not compel a different
result: the agreements in those cases contained no comparable provision giving
“transfer” such a broad definition. See CenturyTel, Inc., 516 F.3d at 609 – 610 (setting
out the transfer restriction agreement); Engel, 703 F.2d at 128 – 129 (setting out the
restriction on stock transfers). 
CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 10 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 11 of 22 Page ID

#:2873

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

inconsistency between the agreements by virtue of the fact that the LLC Agreement
contains restrictions on transfers of control that are not contained in the Omnibus
Agreement. In fact, it is natural to expect that the two agreements would place
substantially different restrictions on the relationships between the parties because the
agreements have entirely different purposes. The Omnibus Agreement addresses the
overall relationship between the parties, including the formation and capitalization of the
LLC, whereas the LLC Agreement addresses the management and operation of the LLC. 
Therefore, there is nothing inconsistent or surprising about the fact that the LLC
Agreement contains restrictions on the transfer of ultimate control over the LLC that
have no correlate in the Omnibus Agreement. 5

Additionally, this interpretation of the LLC Agreement does not entail absurd

results. The Court rejects defendants’ argument that plaintiff’s interpretation compels
the result that any transfer of Societe Generale or TCW’s stock requires EIG consent. 
Plaintiff’s position is consistent with the position that transfers of a minority of the
equity interest in the direct or indirect owners of TAMCO do not amount to a transfer of
all of the equity interest of a Membership Interest. Here, plaintiff is arguing that total
transfer of control over TAMCO results in a full transfer of the Membership Interest held
by TAMCO, and that argument does not entail that a transfer of a minority ownership
interest in Societe Generale would somehow be a transfer of a small portion of
TAMCO’s Membership Interest. The Court also rejects defendants’ argument that it is
absurd to find that a term in the appendix of the LLC agreement has the far-reaching
consequence of preventing the Carlyle transaction. 6

5

Additionally, the Court agrees with plaintiff that the “sole and exclusive remedy”

clause of § 4.6 of the Omnibus Agreement, accelerating the Omnibus Agreement to
phase 3, does not limit plaintiff’s remedies to acceleration to phase 3 because the parties
have already entered phase 3. Nothing in § 4.6 suggests that plaintiff should be deprived
of any remedy for the events mentioned in that section in the event that the parties
already entered phase 3. 

6

In a supplemental filing, defendants argue that EIG’s principles Blair Thomas

and Randall Wade acted inconsistently with EIG’s position in this litigation by
transferring their equity interests in EIG to trusts without consent of TAMCO’s board,
CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 11 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 12 of 22 Page ID

#:2874

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

Although an injunction restraining TAMCO alone would likely suffice to prevent

the sale and, as a practical matter, preserve the status quo pending arbitration, plaintiff is
also likely to succeed in proving that the other TCW defendants are liable for any breach
of the LLC Agreement caused by TAMCO. First, the Omnibus Agreement specifically
provides that “the TCW Parties agree not to take and agree not to permit any of their
respective affiliates to take, any action intended to circumvent, diminish, or impair the
economic, governance or other rights of the other parties and under this agreement.” 
Omnibus Agreement § 9.2. Since the Omnibus Agreement provided that TAMCO and
EIG were to enter the LLC Agreement, and the LLC Agreement was attached to the
Omnibus Agreement, this provision prevents TCW from taking any action that would
impair EIG’s governance rights under the LLC Agreement. Second, as TAMCO’s
parent, TCW faces liability for any breach of the LLC Agreement by TAMCO because
“a parent corporation may be held liable for the wrongdoing of a subsidiary where the
parent directly participated in the subsidiary’s unlawful actions.” Esmark, Inc. v.
N.L.R.B., 887 F.2d 739, 756 (7th Cir. 1989). If TCW takes action through TAMCO that
violates the LLC Agreement, it therefore faces liability for breach of the LLC
Agreement. 

For these reasons, the Court finds that plaintiff has a strong likelihood of success on

the merits as against both TCW and TAMCO. 

and thereby effected an upstream transfer of a Membership Interest in violation of § 5.1. 
As plaintiff points out in reply, this is course of performance evidence and hence cannot
be relied upon because the Court finds § 5.1 unambiguous on its face. In any event,
there is no inconsistency between EIG’s litigation position and the actions of Thomas
and Wade. Here, EIG’s litigation position is that § 5.1 prevents upstream transfers that
lead to a change in control of the entities that control TAMCO, and the transfers by
Thomas and Wade to the trusts did not lead to a change in control over EIG. See Second
Supplemental Thomas Decl. ¶ 3 (“I have, and at all times have had, full control over the
exercise of any and all voting or other governance rights with respect to the Trust’s
ownership interests in EIG.”); Wade Decl. ¶ 2 (“I have, and at all times have had, and
exercised, full control over the exercise of any and all voting or other governance rights
with respect to the Trusts’ ownership interests in EIG.”). 
CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 12 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 13 of 22 Page ID

#:2875

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

C. Plaintiff Will Suffer Irreparable Harm if the Sale is Executed

Plaintiff argues that it is facing irreparable harm as a matter of law. As explained

above, plaintiff likely has a right under § 5.1 of the LLC Agreement to prevent a transfer
of TAMCO’s Membership Interests without the consent of a board supermajority, and
plaintiff argues that if the sale of TCW proceeds it will irretrievably lose that right. 
Plaintiff claims that settled authority recognizes that the loss of this type of right – the
bargained for right to prevent business transactions resulting in substantial change in
corporate structure or business relationships – necessarily results in irreparable harm. 
See CDC Group PLC v. Cogentrix Energy, Inc., 354 F. Supp. 2d 387, 394 (S.D.N.Y.
2005); Empresas Cablevision, S.A.B. de C.V. v. J.P. Morgan Chase Bank, N.A., 680 F.
Supp. 2d 625, 633 (S.D. N.Y. 2010). Alternatively, plaintiff argues that that it will suffer
irreparable harm because the transaction will allow Carlyle to obtain sensitive EIG
information, to exercise management control over the joint venture, will result in
marketplace confusion, and will render plaintiff unable to make certain types of
investments. 

In response, defendants argue that the harm plaintiff claims to suffer is too
speculative to warrant granting an injunction. Moreover, defendants argue that
plaintiff’s concerns about its confidential information are misplaced because the
Omnibus Agreement provides protection for confidential EIG information in this
context. Additionally, citing to Vantico Holdings S.A. v. Apollo Management, L.P, 247
F. Supp. 2d 437 (S.D. N.Y. 2003), defendants claim that the Court should not presume
that plaintiff will suffer harm from any managerial control Carlyle might exercise over
TAMCO because there is no evidence that Carlyle and its agents would ignore their
fiduciary duties and economic self interest by sabotaging the joint venture. 

The Court finds that plaintiff is likely to suffer irreparable harm if the acquisition
goes forward in apparent violation of the LLC Agreement. Because complex business
transactions cannot be simply unwound, bargained for rights to prevent changes in
business structure and ownership are irreversibly lost after a transaction breaching those
rights occurs. This principle is illustrated well in Empresas Cablevision, S.A.B. de C.V.
680 F. Supp. 2d at 633. There, the plaintiff sued to enjoin defendants’ plan to sell a 90%
interest in a loan defendant made to plaintiff to a bank controlled by individuals who

CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 13 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 14 of 22 Page ID

#:2876

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

also owned one of plaintiff’s competitors. Id. at 627. Plaintiff argued that this sale was
barred by a provision that gave plaintiff the right to veto any assignment of the loan by
defendant. Id. The district court found that plaintiff faced irreparable harm because
defendants’ planned sale would “emasculate [plaintiff’s] right to veto assignments of the
loan, and this sort of injury is irreparable as a matter of law.” Id. at 633. The Court
further explained that “[w]hen a party has expressly negotiated for and received the right
to veto certain transactions with which it disagreed before those transactions
commenced, a right that is irretrievably lost upon breach, and may not be compensable
by non-speculative damages, the only way to render such a provision truly viable is to
enforce it.” Id. (following Wisdom Import Sales Co. v. Labatt Brewing Company, 339
F.3d 101, 114 (2d Cir. 2003) (internal quotation marks omitted). 

Here, plaintiff is asserting a right to prevent a transfer in the control of TAMCO, its

partner in a cooperative venture, without supermajority approval. If this right is not
given interim protection, it will be lost once the announced acquisition of TCW is
consummated. This result would interfere with the arbitration process and leave plaintiff
without a meaningful remedy should it succeed on the merits. Consequently, the Court
finds that plaintiff is likely to face irreparable harm if it is not granted preliminary relief.7

D. The Balance of the Equities Tips in Plaintiff’s Favor 

As explained above, plaintiff faces irreparable harm from the irretrievable loss of its
right to influence who controls TAMCO’s Membership Interest in the LLC. Defendants
argue that balance of equities nonetheless tips in defendants’ favor because a temporary
injunction would create a serious risk that the sale to Carlyle would collapse. The
collapse of the sale would in turn harm TCW through “negative consequences to the 

7

Since the Court’s decision is that the type of injury plaintiff faces constitutes
irreparable harm as a matter of law, the Court need not make findings regarding the
likelihood that Carlyle would misappropriate confidential business information from
defendant or make poor management decisions relating to the operation of the joint
venture in an attempt to sabotage EIG’s business. Accordingly, Vantico Holdings, 247
F. Supp. 2d 437, does not compel a contrary result. 
CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL
CV-12-7173 (11/12)

Page 14 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 15 of 22 Page ID

#:2877

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

stability of the institution,” causing employees and clients to lose faith in TCW. See
Stern Decl. ¶¶ 52 – 53. 

The Court finds that defendants have not shown that any great harm will result from

the temporary injunction. While defendants speculate that the injunction itself would
cause the sale to Carlyle to collapse, there is no showing that this result is certain and no
showing that a comparably beneficial transaction would be impossible were it to prevail
in arbitration. Therefore, since plaintiff faces irreparable harm that cannot be undone if
it prevails in arbitration, the balance of the equities tips in plaintiff’s favor. 

8

The analysis reached here is akin to the district court’s reasoning in CDC Group

PLC v. Cogentrix Energy, Inc., 354 F. Supp. 2d 387, 394 (S.D.N.Y. 2005). In that case,
the plaintiff, a minority shareholder in a joint venture with the defendant, sought to
enjoin the defendant from selling its shares in the joint venture pursuant to an anti-
transfer provision. Id. at 388. Balancing the equities, the district court found that a
preliminary injunction preventing defendant from selling its shares would cause minimal
harm, reasoning that while the injunction could deprive the defendants of one chance to
sell their shares, there was no evidence that the defendants would not be able to arrange a
comparable sale if it prevailed at trial. Id. at 394. In contrast, the district court found
that the plaintiff faced greater harm because if it prevailed at trial but defendants had
already sold their shares, defendants “could not readily be brought back into a forced
ownership position without incalculable disruption.” Id. 

E. The Public Interest Favors Granting an Injunction

District courts are required to weigh the public interest implicated by an injunction. 

Stormans, Inc. v. Selecky, 586 F.3d 1109, 1138 (9th Cir. 2009). However, “[w]hen the
reach of an injunction is narrow, limited only to the parties, and has no impact on non-
parties, the public interest will be at most a neutral factor in the analysis rather than one

8

In fact, the evidence suggests that Carlyle and TCW knew that EIG planned to

challenge the sale to Carlyle, and hence that any delay caused by a temporary injunction
could have been anticipated and should not cause the transaction to collapse. See
Supplemental Thomas Decl. ¶¶ 5 – 6. 
CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 15 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 16 of 22 Page ID

#:2878

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

that favors granting or denying the preliminary injunction.” Id. This case is a contract
dispute that does not implicate any broad public interest beyond the signatories to the
contracts and their close business associates. Although the proposed injunction in this
case affects the rights of non-parties Societe Generale and Carlyle, the impact of the
injunction is limited to these private parties and does not implicate the public interest. 
Accordingly, since the other factors weigh in favor of a preliminary injunction, and
because a preliminary injunction ensures that the parties receive a meaningful arbitration,
this factor does not preclude granting an injunction. 9

F. Proper Scope of the Injunction

The preceding analysis demonstrates that a preliminary injunction should be granted

to preserve EIG’s right to prevent transfers of control over TAMCO’s Membership
Interest in the LLC pending the completion of the arbitration, and the Court now
considers how to structure a narrowly tailored injunction that protects EIG’s contractual
rights but places no unnecessary burdens on defendants’ interest in closing the Carlyle
transaction. Califano v. Yamasaki, 442 U.S. 682, 702 (1979) (“injunctive relief should
be no more burdensome to the defendant than necessary to provide complete relief to the
plaintiffs.”). The parties have suggested different forms that such an injunction could
take. Plaintiff proposes that the Court issue an injunction preventing the TCW parties
from closing the Carlyle transaction and taking certain preliminary steps necessary to
close the transaction. Plaintiff maintains that preventing the Carlyle transaction from
taking place is the only way to insure that no transfer of control over the Membership
Interest takes place. 

Defendants propose a far narrower injunction. They propose that the injunction

take a form analogous to a “hold separate” order, which is commonly issued in antitrust

9

The parties also submitted numerous evidentiary objections. The Court does not

rely on the evidence to which objections are asserted. Instead, as is apparent from the
text of the order, the Court’s decision rests on its interpretation of the language of the
Omnibus Agreement and LLC Agreement, and its finding that irreparable harm has been
shown absent the issuance of an injunction. Accordingly, these objections are hereby
overruled as moot.
CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 16 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 17 of 22 Page ID

#:2879

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

cases involving mergers. “A hold separate order requires a firm to refrain from
intermixing the business operations of one portion of the assets it controls with those of
its remaining business.” Antitrust Law 3d Ed., Areeda and Hovenkamp, ¶ 990c4
(internal quotation marks omitted). A hold separate order is used to maintain the
integrity of a firm being acquired through merger pending resolution of litigation
challenging the merger. Id.; see also FTC v. Weyerhaeuser Co., 665 F.2d 1072, 1075
(“The aim of [a hold separate order] is to maintain an acquired unit as a viable
competitor while the litigation unfolds, and to safeguard ‘unscrambled’ the assets
acquired so that they may be divested effectively should the government ultimately
prevail.”). If the challenge to the merger is successful, then the firm that has been held
separate is neatly subject to divestiture. Antitrust Law 3d Ed., Areeda and Hovenkamp,
¶ 990c4. 

Although hold separate orders have their origin in antitrust law, courts have

employed them in other contexts to protect contractual rights. In Roche Diagnostics
Corp. v. Medical Automation Systems, Inc., 646 F.3d 424 (7th Cir. 2011), plaintiff had a
contractual right of first refusal with respect to the acquisition of stock and assets of its
business partner MAS. Upon learning of MAS’ plan to sell its stock to one of plaintiff’s
competitors, plaintiff filed a lawsuit and sought a preliminary injunction to preserve its
right of first refusal pending contractually mandated arbitration. The Seventh Circuit
found that plaintiff’s right of first refusal could be preserved pending arbitration if the
sale of MAS was allowed to go forward subject to a hold separate order that required
MAS to maintain its current employees, business operations, material assets, and not
share confidential information with its acquirer. Id. at 426. The Seventh Circuit found
that this hold separate order preserved plaintiff’s right to relief because it insured that
“the transaction can be undone and the business transferred to [plaintiff] – with its full
value intact – should the arbitrator rule in [plaintiff’s] favor.” Id. 

Here, the defendants propose that if the underlying arbitration in this case is not

completed within ten days prior to the date the Carlyle transaction is set to close, then the
Membership Interest held by TAMCO should be held separate and the rest of the Carlyle
transaction should be allowed to go forward. Defendants explain that the Membership
Interest can be held separate by transferring it to a trust that will hold the Membership
Interest for the sole benefit of TAMCO. This trust will be managed by two trustees, one

CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 17 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 18 of 22 Page ID

#:2880

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

of whom is appointed by EIG and one of whom is appointed by Societe Generale, and
these trustees will be charged with exercising the voting and governance rights attached
to TAMCO’s membership interest. Defendants assure the Court that this arrangement
would prevent the Carlyle Group from playing any role in the business or investment 

decisions of the LLC. A graphic representation of the effect of defendants’ proposed
injunction is: 

Plaintiff argues that in this case, unlike Roche, a hold separate order is not sufficient
to protect its rights under the LLC Agreement and Omnibus Agreement. Plaintiff claims
that it has the right to be in a joint venture relationship with TAMCO while that entity is

CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 18 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 19 of 22 Page ID

#:2881

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

controlled by TCW and, ultimately, Societe Generale, and that forcing it to accept any
other arrangement is a violation of its contractual rights. Plaintiff also argues that
defendants’ proposed injunction would violate the terms of the LLC Agreement, because
while the agreement allows TAMCO to transfer the Membership Interest downstream to
an entity it controls, the agreement does not allow it to transfer control over the
Membership Interest upstream to an entity that controls TAMCO. 

The Court finds that defendants’ proposed hold separate injunction adequately

protects plaintiff’s right to obtain full relief. Under the LLC Agreement and Omnibus
Agreement, plaintiff is guaranteed that control over the Membership Interest will not
pass from TAMCO, which in turn is controlled by Societe Generale. These agreements
do not, however, entitle plaintiff to any rights with respect to other assets held by
TAMCO or any other TCW entity. Hypothetically, the TCW entities and Societe
Generale could spin-off all TCW assets except the Membership Interest into a new
company as set forth in the below hypothetical transaction, and this transaction would be
wholly consistent with plaintiff’s rights as long as TAMCO was still the holder of the
Membership Interest and no upstream change in control over TAMCO occurred. 
Plaintiff would have no interest in the assets held by the new company pursuant to the
LLC Agreement and Omnibus Agreement. Consequently, control over this new
company and its assets could change and no violation of plaintiff’s rights would occur. 
No violation of plaintiff’s rights would occur in this hypothetical spin-off and sale.
A10
graphic representation of this hypothetical transaction is: 

10

At oral argument, counsel for plaintiff argued that the hypothetical transaction
would violate plaintiff’s rights if, in the course of spinning off TAMCO’s other assets,
TAMCO also changed its employees and managers. Plaintiff’s counsel further argued
that defendants’ proposed transfer of the Membership Interest to a trust would lead to
such a change in employees and management in violation of plaintiff’s rights. The Court
disagrees. Nothing in the LLC or Omnibus Agreements gives EIG control over which
individuals may act as the employees or managers of TAMCO. While counsel for
plaintiff argues that a change of management could cause such a change in the structure
of TAMCO to be equivalent to a change of control, this argument ignores that as the
parent corporation, Societe Generale could change TAMCO’s management without there
being any breach of the LLC or Omnibus Agreements. 
CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 19 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 20 of 22 Page ID

#:2882

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

What the hypothetical transaction illustrates is that the LLC Agreement and

Omnibus Agreement only give plaintiff a right to prevent transactions that have an effect
on control over the Membership Interest held by TAMCO. A transaction can radically
change other TCW assets and other aspects of the corporate structure of TCW entities
without violating plaintiff’s rights. As long as ultimate control over the Membership
Interest remains unaltered, plaintiff’s rights have not been violated. 

It follows that defendants’ proposed injunction is sufficient to secure the remedy to

which plaintiff would be entitled if it succeeds in arbitration. The hypothetical

CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 20 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 21 of 22 Page ID

#:2883

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

transaction is equivalent to defendants’ proposal for purposes of the LLC and Omnibus
Agreements, and because plaintiffs’ rights are not violated in the hypothetical
transaction, they are not violated under defendants’ proposal either. This is the case
because in the corporate structure that results from defendants’ proposed injunction,
ultimate control over the Membership Interest remains in the hands of Societe Generale
even though all other assets held by TCW entities have been transferred. By separating
the Membership Interest from other Carlyle assets, this remedy preserves plaintiff’s
interest in preventing changes in control over the Membership Interest pending the
completion of the arbitration, but by leaving all other aspects of the Carlyle transaction
intact, it reaches no further. 

Therefore, defendants’ proposed form of injunction will ensure that plaintiff has the

remedy to which it is entitled if it prevails in arbitration, and it is far more narrowly
tailored to achieve this result while not interfering with defendants’ ability to proceed to
close the transaction as to matters that do not implicate plaintiff’s rights. All that
defendants’ proposed injunction accomplishes is placing the Membership Interest in a
trust, which effectively holds this interest separate from the rest of the transaction
pending a ruling by the arbitrator. Consequently, the Court finds that defendants’ form
of injunction should issue.

11

11

Defendants’ proposal in some ways does not function as a true hold separate

order because it is not structured to allow plaintiff to unwind the Carlyle transaction. A
typical hold separate order prevents intermingling and change of control in order to
insure that a transaction can be unwound. In this case, however, plaintiff would have no
right to unwind the transaction, but only has a right to block changes in control over the
membership interest. Therefore, the hold separate order in this case does not need to
preserve unwinding or divestment of ownership as a remedy, it only needs to prevent
transfer of control. Preservation of divestment of ownership as a remedy may be a
necessary feature of a hold separate order in the antitrust context, but it is not necessary
here. 
CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 21 of 22

Case 2:12-cv-07173-CAS-MAN Document 112 Filed 11/30/12 Page 22 of 22 Page ID

#:2884

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
CENTRAL DISTRICT OF CALIFORNIA

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Case No.
Title

CV 12-7173 CAS (MANx)
EIG GLOBAL ENERGY PARTNERS, LLC V. TCW ASSET
MANAGEMENT COMPANY, ET AL

Date November 30, 2012

V. CONCLUSION

In accordance with the foregoing, the Court hereby GRANTS plaintiff’s request for

a preliminary injunction. Plaintiff within five days of the issuance of this order shall
post a bond in the amount of $50,000. 

IT IS SO ORDERED.

Initials of Preparer

00

:

CJ

43

CV-12-7173 (11/12)

CIVIL MINUTES - GENERAL

Page 22 of 22


























Houston, TX | EIG Partners




































Investor Login













 





Our
People



 










                            Houston, TX                          




Name


 
Title
Practice Area /Sector Focus
Location






 


Abigail  Hunter
Executive Assistant
Administration, Investment Team, Harbour Energy, Ltd.
Houston, TX





 


Amy Springs
Vice President & Associate Counsel
Legal & Compliance
Houston, TX





 


Andrew Tharp
Assistant Vice President
Investment Team, Oil & Gas
Houston, TX





 


Aneil Kochar
Assistant Vice President
Investment Team, Oil & Gas
Houston, TX





 


Angel Dunn
Executive Assistant
Administration, Executive Management
Houston, TX





 


Austin Pearson
Assistant Vice President
Investment Team, Oil & Gas
Houston, TX





 


B. Fielding Turlington
Vice President
Investment Team, Harbour Energy, Ltd.
Houston, TX





 


Ben Rodgers
Senior Vice President
Investment Team, Oil & Gas
Houston, TX





 


Billy Rogers
Analyst
Investment Team, Oil & Gas
Houston, TX





 


Bryan Lothrop
Associate
Investment Team, Oil & Gas
Houston, TX






Pages1
2
3
next ›
last »

 







 





Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft





























AMG Announces Investment in EIG Global Energy Partners, William C. Sonneborn Appointed President of EIG | EIG Partners




































Investor Login













 





Press
Release



 










                             AMG Announces Investment in EIG Global Energy Partners, William C. Sonneborn Appointed President of EIG                          

March 28, 2014
BOSTON AND WASHINGTON, D.C., March 28, 2014 – Affiliated Managers Group, Inc. (NYSE: AMG), a global asset management company, and EIG Global Energy Partners, LLC ("EIG") announced today that AMG is acquiring an equity interest in EIG. EIG’s management team continues to hold a majority of the equity in the company, and consistent with AMG’s partnership approach, will retain operating autonomy of the business. 
EIG also announced today that William C. Sonneborn has been appointed President of EIG effective May 5, 2014.
EIG is a leading global alternative investment firm specializing in private investments in energy and energy-related infrastructure, with the longest continuous track record of any institutional investor in the industry. Since its founding in 1982, EIG has made nearly 300 portfolio investments in 34 countries on six continents, across the full spectrum of the energy sector. Headquartered in Washington, D.C., with offices in Houston, Hong Kong, London, Rio de Janeiro, Sydney and Seoul, EIG employs a disciplined long-term approach built on a deep technical understanding of the sector, and is recognized as an industry leader in providing innovative capital solutions to leading companies and projects in the energy sector. As of December 31, 2013, the firm had $15.9 billion in assets under management.
EIG has consistently delivered strong risk-adjusted returns through multiple commodity and business cycles, and invests on a global basis across the entire energy value chain, including upstream, midstream, energy-related infrastructure, power generation, renewables and resources. The firm’s diversified client base includes over 400 leading institutional investors from 20 countries, including prominent pension plans, insurance companies, endowments, foundations and sovereign wealth funds.
“With an outstanding long-term investment track record, and unmatched expertise in investing in energy and commodity markets, EIG is regarded as among the preeminent investors in the sector by sophisticated institutions and industry participants around the world,” said Sean M. Healey, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of AMG. “Given EIG’s exceptional reputation and competitive position, we believe the firm is uniquely placed to capitalize on the increasing investment opportunities in the energy sector and generate strong organic growth, as global clients continue to seek attractive risk-adjusted ways to deploy capital in this area. Through our partnership with EIG, AMG is adding a new range of excellent strategies to our growing and diverse alternative product set. I am very pleased to welcome Blair Thomas and his partners to our Affiliate group.”
“With its unparalleled track record as a partner to leading boutique alternative firms, including a broad range of strategic capabilities through which AMG leverages its global scale on behalf of its Affiliates, AMG is the ideal permanent partner for EIG as we move into our next phase of growth and development,” said R. Blair Thomas, Chief Executive Officer of EIG. “At EIG, we have employed a very focused and disciplined investment approach for more than 30 years, and our partnership with AMG will allow us to maintain both our operating culture and investment decision-making autonomy to best serve our global client base. We are also extremely pleased to have Bill Sonneborn join our firm as President. Bill is uniquely qualified to help guide EIG through the next stage of our growth based on his prior industry experience and his familiarity with EIG from our time together at TCW.”
As part of the transaction, all of the senior professionals at EIG have agreed to long-term commitments to remain with the firm. The terms of the transaction were not disclosed, and the parties expect to complete the investment during the month of April.
About Affiliated Managers Group
AMG is a global asset management company with equity investments in leading boutique investment management firms. AMG’s innovative partnership approach allows each Affiliate’s
management team to own significant equity in their firm while maintaining operational autonomy. AMG’s strategy is to generate growth through the internal growth of existing Affiliates, as well as through investments in new Affiliates. In addition, AMG provides centralized assistance to its Affiliates in strategic matters, marketing, distribution, product development and operations. As of December 31, 2013, the aggregate assets under management of AMG’s Affiliates were approximately $568 billion (pro forma for pending investments) in more than 400 investment products across a broad range of investment styles, asset classes and distribution channels. For more information, please visit the Company’s website at www.amg.com.
About EIG Global Energy Partners
EIG specializes in private investments in energy and energy-related infrastructure on a global basis. EIG is headquartered in Washington, D.C. with offices in Houston, London, Sydney, Rio de Janeiro, Hong Kong and Seoul. In 2010, EIG completed a consensual spin-out from The TCW Group, Inc. For more information, visit www.eigpartners.com. William C. Sonneborn Mr. Sonneborn, 44, currently serves as Senior Advisor to KKR & Co. Until October 2013, he was a member of the ultimate general partner of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. and a member of KKR’s Management Committee. Mr. Sonneborn served as CEO of KKR Asset Management (the public markets side of KKR) as well as CEO and Director of KKR Financial LLC (NYSE: KFN), a publicly-traded specialty finance and energy business. He was a member of the Credit, Mezzanine, Real Estate and Special Situations Investment Committees. Prior to joining KKR, Mr. Sonneborn was with The TCW Group, Inc., most recently as President and Chief Operating Officer and CEO of The TCW Funds, Inc.
Certain matters discussed in this press release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the federal securities laws. Actual results and the timing of certain events could differ materially from those projected in or contemplated by the forward-looking statements due to a number of factors, including changes in the securities or financial markets or in general economic conditions, the availability of equity and debt financing, competition for acquisitions of interests in investment management firms, the ability to close pending investments, the investment performance of our Affiliates and their ability to effectively market their investment strategies, and other risks detailed from time to time in AMG’s filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Reference is hereby made to the “Risk Factors” set forth in the Company’s Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013. AMG routinely posts information that may be significant for investors in the Investor Relations section of its website, and encourages investors to consult that section regularly. For additional information, please visit www.amg.com. 
AMG routinely posts information that may be significant for investors in the Investor Relations section of its website, and encourages investors to consult that section regularly. For additional information, please visit www.amg.com. 
EIG Global Energy Partners, LLC
Allison Oyster
(202)478-3808
aoyster@apcoworldwide.com
Affiliated Managers Group, Inc.
Investor Relations:
Alexander Lynn
(617)747-3300
ir@amg.com
Media Relations:
Laur O'Brien
(617)747-3300
pr@amg.com









 






















About Us | EIG Partners




































Investor Login













 





About
Us



 










                            About Us                          







1982
established


 

7
offices


 

6
continents


 

36
countries


 



$23.7B
invested capital


 

317
portfolio companies


 

60
investment professionals


 

13
engineers


 
 


Since 1982, EIG has been one of the leading providers of institutional capital to the global energy industry, providing financing solutions across the balance sheet for companies and projects in the oil & gas, midstream, infrastructure, power and renewables sectors globally. EIG has invested more than $23.5 billion in more than 315 portfolio investments in 36 countries. The firm’s deep sector expertise and internal technical capabilities permit EIG to structure creative solutions for our industry partners in complex situations.
Our investment approach, which emphasizes capital preservation and the opportunity to participate in the upside of projects we finance, seeks to generate returns for our investors over multiple business and commodity cycles. Across the funds we manage, EIG has the capability to invest at any place in the capital structure of an energy project or company, from common equity to senior debt. EIG funds typically invest in hybrid debt or structured equity securities but have the flexibility to work with our partners to craft a customized solution to their financing challenge. We typically seek to commit a minimum of $100 million to a project or company and have the capacity to commit $1 billion or more to a single transaction.
EIG is an independent partnership with a distinct culture focused on teamwork, integrity and transparency. We operate as a single investment team and all of our senior professionals have capital committed to our funds. Our senior team has over 440 years of investing experience primarily focused on energy and related infrastructure. The firm has more than 110 employees operating from offices in Washington, DC, Houston, Hong Kong, London, Sydney, Seoul and Rio de Janeiro.
 
Information current as of March 31, 2017.


 









 


